Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 6. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 150C. ENTITY NAME FALSELY IMPLYING GOVERNMENTAL AFFILIATION

Sec. 150C.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "governmental unit" has the meaning assigned by Section 101.001.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 658 (H.B. 1493), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 150C.002. FALSELY IMPLYING GOVERNMENTAL AFFILIATION. (a) A governmental unit is entitled to enjoin another person's use of an entity name that falsely implies governmental affiliation with the governmental unit.

(b) In an action brought under this section, the governmental unit is entitled to injunctive relief throughout the state.

(c) If the court finds that the person against whom the injunctive relief is sought wilfully intended to imply governmental affiliation with the governmental unit, the court, in the court's discretion, may award reasonable attorney's fees and court costs to the governmental unit.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 658 (H.B. 1493), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.